Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-178
Sale at retail; forbidden in dwelling or lodging house; exceptions.

Except in the case of hotels and clubs, no alcoholic liquor shall be manufactured or sold at retail or wholesale upon any premises which have any access which leads from such premises to any other portion of the same building or structure used for dwelling or lodging purposes and permitted to be used or kept accessible for use by the public. This section does not prevent any connection between such premises and such other portion of the building or structure which is used only by the licensee or his or her family and personal guests.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 36, p. 399;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-336;

R.S.1943, § 53-178;

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 28.